Utah statutes.
9-7-211.   Local libraries -- Annual reports.

All municipal, city, county, and public school libraries shall submit an annual report to the director of the division on the condition and affairs of each library as required by the State Library Board.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 241, 1992 General Session

